Washington statutes.
RCW 18.134.030

Telehealth authorization.

(1) A health care practitioner may provide telehealth services to a patient located in this state if the services are consistent with the health care practitioner's scope of practice in this state, applicable professional practice standards in this state, and requirements and limitations of federal law and law of this state.

(2) This chapter does not authorize provision of health care otherwise regulated by federal law or law of this state, unless the provision of health care complies with the requirements, limitations, and prohibitions of the federal law or law of this state.

(3) A practitioner-patient relationship may be established through telehealth. A practitioner-patient relationship may not be established through email, instant messaging, text messaging, or fax.

[ 2024 c 212 s 4.]